California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(c) “Passenger stage corporation” does not include the transportation of persons between home and work locations or of persons having a common work-related trip purpose in a vehicle having a seating capacity of 15 passengers or less, including the driver, which is used for the purpose of ridesharing, as defined in Section 522 of the Vehicle Code, when the ridesharing is incidental to another purpose of the driver. This exemption also applies to a vehicle having a seating capacity of more than 15 passengers if the driver files with the commission evidence of liability insurance protection in the same amount and in the same manner as required for a passenger stage corporation, and the vehicle undergoes and passes an annual safety inspection by the Department of the California Highway Patrol. The insurance filing shall be accompanied by a one-time filing fee of seventy-five dollars ($75). This exemption does not apply if the primary purpose for the transportation of those persons is to make a profit. “Profit,” as used in this subdivision, does not include the recovery of the actual costs incurred in owning and operating a vanpool vehicle, as defined in Section 668 of the Vehicle Code.

(d) “Passenger stage corporation” does not include that part of the operations of any corporation or person engaged in the ownership, control, operation, or management of any medical transportation vehicles, including vehicles employed to transport developmentally disabled persons for regional centers established pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 4620) of Division 4.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) “Passenger stage corporation” does not include the transportation of persons which is ancillary to commercial river rafting and is for the sole purpose of returning passengers to the point of origin of their rafting trip.

(f) “Passenger stage corporation” does not include social service transportation delivered by a nonprofit social service transportation provider or a locally licensed or franchised for-profit transportation provider which operates, in dedicated vehicles, social service transportation pursuant to contract with a nonprofit social service transportation provider organization as long as the provider does not use a vehicle designed for carrying more than 16 persons, including the driver, or does not operate vehicles which offer transportation services over regularly scheduled or fixed routes.

(g) “Passenger stage corporation” does not include intrastate passenger transportation service conducted pursuant to federal operating authority to the extent that regulation of these intrastate operations by the commission is preempted by the federal Bus Regulatory Reform Act of 1982 (P.L. 97-261), as amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 122, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

227.

“Pipe line” includes all real estate, fixtures, and personal property, owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate the transmission, storage, distribution, or delivery of crude oil or other fluid substances except water through pipe lines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

228.

“Pipeline corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any pipeline for compensation within this state.

“Pipeline corporation” shall not include a corporation or person employing landfill gas technology and owning, controlling, operating, or managing any pipeline solely for the transmission or distribution of landfill gas or other form of energy generated or produced therefrom.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 214, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

229.

“Railroad” includes every commercial, interurban, and other railway, other than a street railroad, and each branch or extension thereof, by whatsoever power operated, together with all tracks, bridges, trestles, rights of way, subways, tunnels, stations, depots, union depots, ferries, yards, grounds, terminals, terminal facilities, structures, and equipment, and all other real estate, fixtures, and personal property of every kind used in connection therewith, owned, controlled, operated, or managed for public use in the transportation of persons or property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

“Railroad corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any railroad for compensation within this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

230.3.

“Service area,” for purposes of the operations of a telephone corporation, means a local access and transport area as defined and approved by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia circuit in the case of the United States v. Western Electric Co., Inc., and American Telephone and Telegraph Co., CA 82-0192, April 20 and July 8, 1983, and in a Memorandum and Order of August 5, 1983.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 796, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

230.5.

“Sewer system” includes all real estate, fixtures, and personal property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate sewage collection, treatment, or disposition for sanitary or drainage purposes, including any and all lateral and connecting sewers, interceptors, trunk and outfall lines and sanitary sewage treatment or disposal plants or works, and any and all drains, conduits, and outlets for surface or storm waters, and any and all other works, property or structures necessary or convenient for the collection or disposal of sewage, industrial waste, or surface or storm waters. “Sewer system” shall not include a sewer system which merely collects sewage on the property of a single owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1109.)
-------------------------------------------

230.6.

“Sewer system corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any sewer system for compensation within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

“Street railroad” includes every railway, and each branch or extension thereof, by whatsoever power operated, being mainly upon, along, above or below any street, avenue, road, highway, bridge, or public place within any city or city and county, together with all real estate, fixtures, and personal property of every kind used in connection therewith, owned, controlled, operated, or managed for public use in the transportation of persons or property, but does not include a railway constituting or used as a part of a commercial or interurban railway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

232.

“Street railroad corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any street railroad for compensation within this State, or owning, controlling, operating, or managing as a part of or in conjunction with such street railroad any automobile, jitney bus, stage, or auto stage used in the business of transportation of persons or property for compensation over any public highway in this State between fixed termini or over a regular route.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

“Telephone line” includes all conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables, instruments, and appliances, and all other real estate, fixtures, and personal property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate communication by telephone, whether such communication is had with or without the use of transmission wires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

234.

(a) “Telephone corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any telephone line for compensation within this state.

(b) “Telephone corporation” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any hospital, hotel, motel, or similar place of temporary accommodation owning or operating message switching or billing equipment solely for the purpose of reselling services provided by a telephone corporation to its patients or guests.

(2) Any one-way paging service utilizing facilities that are licensed by the Federal Communications Commission, including, but not limited to, narrowband personal communications services described in Subpart D (commencing with Section 24.100) of Part 24 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as in effect on June 13, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 357, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

“Telegraph line” includes all conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables, instruments, and appliances, and all other real estate, fixtures, and personal property owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate communication by telegraph, whether such communication is had with or without the use of transmission wires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

“Telegraph corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any telegraph line for compensation within this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

237.

“Toll-bridge corporation” includes every private corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any bridge or appurtenance thereto, used for the transportation of persons or property for compensation in this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

237.5.

“Transportation electrification” means the use of electricity from external sources of electrical power, including the electrical grid, for all or part of vehicles, vessels, trains, boats, or other equipment that are mobile sources of air pollution and greenhouse gases and the related programs and charging and propulsion infrastructure investments to enable and encourage this use of electricity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 9.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

238.

(a) “Vessel” includes every species of watercraft, by whatsoever power operated, which is owned, controlled, operated or managed for public use in the transportation of persons or property, except rowboats, sailing boats, barges under 20 tons dead weight carrying capacity, and vessels which are both under the burden of five tons net register and under 30 feet in length. However, a vessel which is under the burden of five tons net register but is 30 or more feet in length is not a “vessel” for the purpose of this section if it is used to provide ship-to-shore services by which stores, supplies, spares, passengers, or crew of oceangoing ships are transported to or from ship and shore and payment for such services is made by, or arranged through, the oceangoing shipping company (commonly referred to as water taxi services).

(b) Nothing in this code except those provisions relating to the regulation of rates shall apply to the transportation by a water carrier of commodities in bulk when the cargo space of the vessel in which such commodities are transported is being used for the carrying of not more than three such commodities. This subsection shall apply only in the case of commodities, in bulk which are loaded and carried without wrappers or containers and received and delivered by the carrier without transportation mark or count. For the purposes of this subsection two or more vessels while navigated as a unit shall be considered to be a single vessel.

(c) Nothing in this code shall apply to the transportation by water of liquid cargoes in bulk in tank vessels designed for use exclusively in such service.

(d) Any person or corporation lawfully engaged in business in the transportation of persons or property during the entire one-year period preceding March 1, 1993, and continuously thereafter, and which, solely by virtue of the amendment to subdivision (a) made by the act that adds this subdivision, will become subject to commission regulation as a common carrier by vessel, shall file with the commission, prior to March 1, 1994, an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity to operate as a common carrier by vessel. However, in lieu of all other fees required by law, the applicant shall pay a fee of fifty dollars ($50). The commission shall issue the certificate without further proceedings authorizing operation over the specific routes or within the specific area which conforms to proof of actual service in the transportation of persons or property as produced by the applicant with respect to its operations during the entire one-year period preceding March 1, 1993, and continuously thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1040, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

239.

(a) (1) “Voice over Internet Protocol” or “VoIP” means voice communications service that does all of the following:

(A) Uses Internet Protocol or a successor protocol to enable real-time, two-way voice communication that originates from, or terminates at, the user’s location in Internet Protocol or a successor protocol.

(B) Requires a broadband connection from the user’s location.

(C) Permits a user generally to receive a call that originates on the public switched telephone network and to terminate a call to the public switched telephone network.

(2) A service that uses ordinary customer premises equipment with no enhanced functionality that originates and terminates on the public switched telephone network, undergoes no net protocol conversion, and provides no enhanced functionality to end users due to the provider’s use of Internet Protocol technology is not a VoIP service.

(b) “Internet Protocol enabled service” or “IP enabled service” means any service, capability, functionality, or application using existing Internet Protocol, or any successor Internet Protocol, that enables an end user to send or receive a communication in existing Internet Protocol format, or any successor Internet Protocol format through a broadband connection, regardless of whether the communication is voice, data, or video.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

240.

“Water system” includes all reservoirs, tunnels, shafts, dams, dikes, headgates, pipes, flumes, canals, structures, and appliances, and all other real estate, fixtures, and personal property, owned, controlled, operated, or managed in connection with or to facilitate the diversion, development, storage, supply, distribution, sale, furnishing, carriage, apportionment, or measurement of water for power, irrigation, reclamation, or manufacturing, or for municipal, domestic, or other beneficial use.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

241.

“Water corporation” includes every corporation or person owning, controlling, operating, or managing any water system for compensation within this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

242.

(a) The commission and Energy Commission shall collaborate to develop and maintain a list of community-based organizations to help ensure adequate public outreach in low-income, disadvantaged, rural, tribal, and unincorporated communities regarding available programs and incentives.

(b) In developing the list pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission and Energy Commission shall work with existing advisory committees and low-income oversight boards, and with current community-based organizations engaged at their respective agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   (SB 1213)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

243.

This part shall not release or waive any right of action by the State, the commission, or any person or corporation for any right, penalty, or forfeiture which may have arisen or accrued or may hereafter arise or accrue under any law of this State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

244.

No transit district, common carrier, or publicly owned transit system shall require any person to waive, limit, or qualify any right to recover damages for injury in exchange for such person being granted a reduction in price or fare for any service offered by the transit district, common carrier, or publicly owned transit system.

“Person,” as used in this section, shall not include an employee of the transit district, common carrier, or publicly owned transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

246.

A person or corporation shall not be a public utility subject to the jurisdiction, control and regulation of the commission and the provisions of this part solely because such person or corporation owns or controls any electric plant (a) which is leased or held for lease or sale to any public utility, or (b) the operation and use of which is vested by lease or other contract in a public utility, or (c) for a period of not more than 90 days after termination of any lease or contract with a public utility or after repossession of such property following a breach of such lease or contract. The commission may upon application issue its order approving the terms of any such lease or contract for the purpose of qualifying such person or corporation for an exemption by the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States from the federal Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, as amended (Chapter 2C (commencing with Section 79) of Title 15, United States Code). This section shall apply only to persons or corporations for which such lease or contract was approved by the commission prior to January 1, 1979. Nothing in this section shall alter or modify the authority of the commission to regulate the rates and service of a person or corporation which is a public utility subject to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 227.)
-------------------------------------------

247.

Any provision of this part that is in conflict with the Communications Act of 1934, as amended, (47 U.S.C. Sec. 332(c)(3)) shall not apply to commercial mobile radio service to the extent of that conflict. If any provision contained in this part applicable to commercial mobile radio service, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is invalid as a result of federal preemption, the remainder of this part, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 198, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

247.1.

(a) The Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act (Public Law 106-252) was enacted for the purpose of establishing nationwide uniform sourcing rules for the imposition of state and local taxes, fees, and surcharges on mobile telecommunications services. In order to establish a single, uniform sourcing rule, the federal act partially preempted state and local law imposing taxes, fees, and surcharges on a mobile telecommunications services customer whose place of primary use is outside of the state in which the state and local taxes, fees, or surcharges are imposed.

(b) In accordance with the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, which is incorporated herein by reference, and
 notwithstanding Sections 275.6, 276.5, 280, 431, 879, and 2881, the surcharges or fees under these sections do not apply to any charges for mobile telecommunications services billed to a customer where those services are provided, or deemed provided, to a customer whose place of primary use is outside this state. Mobile telecommunications services shall be deemed provided by a customer’s home service provider to the customer if those services are provided in a taxing jurisdiction to the customer, and the charges for those services are billed by or for the customer’s home service provider.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Charges for mobile telecommunications services” means any charge for, or associated with, the provision of commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 216.8, or any charge for, or associated with, a service provided as an adjunct to a commercial
 mobile radio service, that is billed to the customer by or for the customer’s home service provider, regardless of whether individual transmissions originate or terminate within the licensed service area of a home service provider.

(2) “Customer” means either (A) the person or entity that contracts with the home service provider for mobile telecommunications services, or (B) if the end user of mobile telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user of the mobile telecommunications service. This paragraph applies only for the purpose of determining the place of primary use. The term “customer” does not include either (A) a reseller of mobile telecommunications service, or (B) a serving carrier under an arrangement to serve the customer outside the home service provider’s licensed service area.

(3) “Home service provider” means the facilities-based carrier or
 reseller with which the customer contracts for the provision of mobile telecommunications services.

(4) “Licensed service area” means the geographic area in which the home service provider is authorized by law or contract to provide commercial mobile radio service to the customer.

(5) “Mobile telecommunications service” means commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Section 216.8.

(6) “Place of primary use” means the street address representative of where the customer’s use of the mobile telecommunications service primarily occurs, that must be:

(A) The residential street address or the primary business street address of the customer.

(B) Within the licensed area of the home service
 provider.

(7) (A) “Reseller” means a provider who purchases telecommunications services from another telecommunications service provider and then resells the services, or uses the services as a component part of, or integrates the purchased services into a mobile telecommunications service.

(B) “Reseller” does not include a serving carrier with which a home service provider arranges for the services to its customers outside the home service provider’s licensed service area.

(8) “Serving carrier” means a facilities-based carrier providing mobile telecommunications service to a customer outside a home service provider’s or reseller’s licensed area.

(9) “Taxing jurisdiction” means any of the several states, the District of Columbia,
 or any territory or possession of the United States, any municipality, city, county, township, parish, transportation district, or assessment jurisdiction, or any other political subdivision within the territorial limits of the United States with the authority to impose a tax, charge, or fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   (SB 1364)   Effective September 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

248.

Any provision of the Public Utilities Act that is in conflict with the railroad provisions of Part A of Subtitle 4 of Title 49 of the United States Code shall be inapplicable to railroad transportation to the extent of that conflict. If any provision in the Public Utilities Act applicable to railroad transportation, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is in conflict with Part A of Subtitle 4 of Title 49 of the United States Code, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall be unaffected to the extent no conflict exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1005, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Advisory Boards [270. - 285.]

270.

(a) The following funds are hereby created in the State Treasury:

(1) The California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund.

(2) The California High-Cost Fund-B Administrative Committee Fund.

(3) The Universal Lifeline Telephone Service Trust Administrative Committee Fund.

(4) The Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund.

(5) The California Teleconnect Fund Administrative Committee Fund.

(6) The California Advanced Services Fund.

(b) Moneys in the funds are held in trust and may only be expended pursuant to this chapter and upon appropriation in the annual Budget Act or upon supplemental appropriation.

(c) The commission, in administering the universal service program funds listed in subdivision (a), and in administering state participation in federal universal service programs, is encouraged, consistent with the state’s universal service policies and goals, to maximize the amount of federal funding to California participants in the federal programs.

(d) Moneys in each fund shall not be appropriated, or in any other manner transferred or
 otherwise diverted, to any other fund or entity, except as provided in Sections 19325 and 19325.1 of the Education Code and as provided in Section 282.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 115, Sec. 74.   (AB 148)   Effective July 22, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

270.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may authorize the trustee of the California High-Cost Fund-B Trust to transfer to the Deaf Equipment Acquisition Fund Trust (DEAF Trust) money sufficient to cover the costs of the programs as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 278, including, but not limited to, all costs specified in subdivision (c) of Section 278. The amount of any transfer of money authorized may not exceed the cost of operating the programs for six months. The commission shall also establish other terms of the transfer, as it determines to be appropriate.

(b) The commission shall reimburse the California High-Cost Fund-B Trust for any transfer of money to the DEAF Trust authorized pursuant to subdivision (a), with interest as determined by the commission.

(c) A sum equivalent to the amount of money transferred to the Deaf Equipment Acquisition Fund Trust (DEAF Trust) pursuant to subdivision (a) is hereby appropriated from the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund to the commission, for allocation to the California High-Cost Fund-B Trust, for purposes of subdivision (b).

(d) Funds may not be transferred from the California High-Cost Fund-B Trust to the DEAF Trust pursuant to subdivision (a) after September 30, 2001.

(e) Commencing on October 1, 2001, and until a date not later than June 30, 2002, reimbursements made to the California High-Cost Fund-B Trust pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be deposited in a separate memorandum account within the DEAF Trust, subject to the terms specified in subdivision (b).

(f) On July 1, 2002, any funds in the DEAF Trust deposited in the memorandum account for purposes of reimbursing the California High-Cost Fund-B Trust shall revert to the Controller for deposit in the California High-Cost Fund-B Trust Committee Fund in the State Treasury rather than the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund.

(g) Commencing on July 1, 2003, any funds remaining in the DEAF Trust, exclusive of those identified in subdivision (f), shall revert to the Deaf and Disabled Telecommunications Program Administrative Committee Fund in the State Treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   Effective June 21, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

271.

For each advisory board created pursuant to this chapter all of the following are applicable:

(a) The commission shall establish the number of, and qualifications for, persons to serve as members of each board, and shall appoint the members of each board. In determining the qualifications of persons who will serve as members of each board, the commission shall consider the purpose of the program, and shall attempt to achieve balanced public participation, for each board. The membership of each board shall reflect, to the extent possible, and consistent with existing law, the ethnic and gender diversity of the state.

(b) Each board shall determine, subject to approval by the commission, the time, location, and number of monthly meetings for each board.

(c) A majority of the number of members of each board constitutes a quorum.

(d) A board cannot act at a meeting without the presence of a quorum.

(e) The affirmative vote of a majority of those members present at the meeting of a board is necessary in order to pass any motion, resolution, or measure.

(f) The commission shall determine for each board whether the board members shall receive expense reimbursement pursuant to Section 19820 of the Government Code and a per diem allowance, as specified in Section 11564.5 of the Government Code, or as established by the commission. Each member of a board who is not a commission or public utility employee, or who is not otherwise compensated by an employer for service on the board, shall be entitled to make a claim for and to receive a per diem allowance, if authorized by the commission. Each member of a board who is not a public utility employee, or who is not otherwise reimbursed by an employer for expenses incurred when serving on the board, shall be entitled to make a claim for and to receive expense reimbursement, if authorized by the commission. The commission shall allow all reasonable expense and per diem claims. The payments in each instance shall be made only from the fund that supports the activities of the board and shall be subject to the availability of money in that fund. The claims shall be filed by the board with the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

273.

Each advisory board created pursuant to this chapter shall do both of the following:

(a) Submit an annual budget to the commission. Within 90 calendar days after receiving a board’s annual budget, the commission shall either accept, accept with conditions, or reject the submitted budget.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7550.5 of the Government Code, submit, in accordance with procedures established by the commission, a report that shall describe the activities of the board during the prior reporting period. The report shall be submitted on an annual or more frequent basis, as ordered by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

274.

The commission may on its own order, whenever it determines it to be necessary, conduct audits or reviews of the revenues required to be collected and submitted to the commission for each of the funds specified in Section 270. The commission may on its own order, whenever it determines it to be necessary, conduct audits or reviews on the compliance with commission orders with regard to each program subject to this chapter. The commission shall
 apply a risk-based methodology to conduct
 audits or reviews of program-related costs and activities. This section does not limit the commission’s authority to initiate an audit or review when circumstances warrant doing so. The commission may contract with the California State Auditor’s Office, the Department of Finance, or another qualified audit or consulting firm for
 any necessary auditing
 or review services if the commission’s own auditing services are not available. All costs for audits or reviews shall be paid from the fund that supports the activities of the board audited or reviewed and shall be subject to the availability of money in that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 22.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

275.

(a) There is hereby created the California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee, which is an advisory board to advise the commission regarding the development, implementation, and administration of a program to provide for transfer payments to small independent telephone corporations providing local exchange services in high-cost rural and small metropolitan areas in the state to create fair and equitable local rate structures, as provided for in Section 275.6, and to carry out the program pursuant to the commission’s direction, control, and approval.

(b) All revenues collected through surcharges authorized by the commission to fund the program specified in subdivision (a) shall
 be submitted to the commission pursuant to a schedule established by the commission. The commission shall transfer the moneys received to the Controller for deposit in the California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund. All interest earned by moneys in the fund shall be deposited in the fund.

(c) Moneys appropriated from the California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund to the commission shall be utilized exclusively by the commission for the program specified in subdivision (a), including all costs of the board and the commission associated with the administration and oversight of the program and the fund.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that, because maintenance of universal public switched telephone network service throughout the state and maintenance of public safety answering points in high-cost areas of the state rely on appropriations from the
 California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund, maintaining adequate funding levels for the fund is critical to public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 520, Sec. 3.   (SB 1364)   Effective September 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

275.6.

(a) The commission shall exercise its regulatory authority to maintain the California High-Cost Fund-A Administrative Committee Fund program (CHCF-A program) to provide universal service rate support to small independent telephone corporations in amounts sufficient to meet the revenue requirements established by the commission through rate-of-return regulation in furtherance of the state’s universal service commitment to the continued affordability and widespread availability of safe, reliable, high-quality communications services in rural areas of the state.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Carrier of last resort” means a telephone corporation
 that is required to fulfill all reasonable requests for service within its service territory.

(2) “Rate base” means the value of a telephone corporation’s plant and equipment that is reasonably necessary to provide regulated voice services and access to advanced services, and upon which the telephone corporation is entitled to a fair opportunity to earn a reasonable rate of return.

(3) “Rate design” means the mix of end user rates, high-cost support, and other revenue sources that are targeted to provide a fair opportunity to meet the revenue requirement of the telephone corporation.

(4) “Rate-of-return regulation” means a regulatory structure whereby the commission establishes a telephone corporation’s revenue requirement, and then fashions a rate design to provide the company a fair opportunity to meet the revenue
 requirement.

(5) “Revenue requirement” means the amount that is necessary for a telephone corporation to recover its reasonable expenses and tax liabilities and earn a reasonable rate of return on its rate base.

(6) “Small independent telephone corporations” are rural incumbent local exchange carriers subject to commission regulation.

(c) In administering the CHCF-A program the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Continue to set rates to be charged by the small independent telephone corporations in accordance with Sections 451, 454, 455, and 728.

(2) Employ rate-of-return regulation to determine a small independent telephone corporation’s revenue requirement in a manner that
 provides revenues and earnings sufficient to allow the telephone corporation to deliver safe, reliable, high-quality voice communication service and fulfill its obligations as a carrier of last resort in its service territory, and to afford the telephone corporation a fair opportunity to earn a reasonable return on its investments, attract capital for investment on reasonable terms, and ensure the financial integrity of the telephone corporation.

(3) Ensure that rates charged to customers of small independent telephone corporations are just and reasonable and are reasonably comparable to rates charged to customers of urban telephone corporations.

(4) Provide universal service rate support from the CHCF-A program to small independent telephone corporations in an amount sufficient to supply the portion of the revenue requirement that cannot reasonably be provided by the customers of
 each small independent telephone corporation after receipt of federal universal service rate support.

(5) Promote customer access to advanced services and deployment of broadband-capable facilities in rural areas that is reasonably comparable to that in urban areas, consistent with national communications policy.

(6) Include all reasonable investments necessary to provide for the delivery of high-quality voice communication services and the deployment of broadband-capable facilities in the rate base of small independent telephone corporations.

(7) Ensure that support is not excessive so that the burden on all contributors to the CHCF-A program is limited.

(d) In order to participate in the CHCF-A program, a small independent telephone corporation shall
 meet all of the following requirements:

(1) Be subject to rate-of-return regulation.

(2) Be subject to the commission’s regulation of telephone corporations pursuant to this division.

(3) Be a carrier of last resort in their service territory.

(4) Qualify as a rural telephone company under federal law (47 U.S.C. Sec. 153(44)).

(e) Upon request from the commission, a small independent telephone corporation that receives support from the CHCF-A program shall provide information regarding revenues derived from the provision of unregulated internet access service by that corporation or its affiliate within that corporation’s telephone service territory. The commission shall treat as
 confidential any information provided pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) The commission shall structure the CHCF-A program so that any charge imposed to promote the goals of universal service reasonably equals the value of the benefits of universal service to contributing entities and their subscribers.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (SB 857)   Effective September 28, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

276.
